Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB650.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1336 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1336. Use of dealer registration plates.* * *(g) Duty of department.--(1) T he department shall maintain at least five in- person locations where a dealer may obtain dealer registration plates in accordance with this subsection.(2) Each location must be open for dealers to obtain dealer registration plates at least two days a week for at least three hours per day.(3) Paragraph (2) shall not apply to in-person locations established by the department in excess of the minimum in-12345678910111213141516171819 person locations required under paragraph (1).(4) The department shall establish the in-person locations in different regions of this Commonwealth in a manner that best serves dealers in this Commonwealth.(5) At least one office shall be located within an existing office that provides licensing and vehicle services in a city of the third class with a population between 48,000 and 55,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4734. Duty of department.(a) Number of locations.--T he department shall maintain at least five in-person locations where a dealer may obtain safety and emissions inspection stickers.(b) Hours of operation.--(1) Each location must be open for dealers to obtain safety and emissions inspection stickers at least two days a week for at least three hours per day.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to in-person locations established by the department in excess of the minimum in-person locations required under subsection (a).(c) Locations.--(1) The department shall establish the in-person locations in different regions of this Commonwealth in a manner that best serves dealers in this Commonwealth.(2) At least one office shall be located within an existing office that provides licensing and vehicle services in a city of the third class with a population between 48,000 and 55,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0650PN0659 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829